Alabama, session 2026rs, SB82.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
38 Section 1. Sections 22-4-32, 22-21-260, 22-21-263,
39 22-21-265, and 22-21-271, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to
40 read as follows:
41 "§22-4-32
42 For purposes of this article, the following terms shall
43 have the following meanings:
44 (1) CERTIFICATE OF NEED REVIEW BOARD. The board which
45 reviews all certificate of need applications as provided in
46 Section 22-21-260(14).
47 (2) COVERED HEALTH CARE REPORTER. The term includes
48 health care facilities as that term is defined in Section
49 22-21-260(6); new institutional health services subject to
50 review as defined in Section 22-21-263; a facility or
51 institution for the care or treatment of any kind of mental or
52 emotional illness or substance abuse or for providing services
53 to persons with intellectual disabilities as defined in
54 Section 22-50-17; and facilities and distinct units as defined
55 in Section 22-21-263(c); and includes any of the foregoing in
56 any rural area as defined in Section 22-21-260.
Page 2

any rural area as defined in Section 22-21-260.
SB82 INTRODUCED
57 (3)(4) HEALTH CARE REPORTS. The written reports to the
58 SHPDA which are required to be submitted by this article.
59 (4)(3) HEALTH CARE INFORMATION AND DATA ADVISORY
60 COUNCIL. The body created by this article which is charged
61 with advising and participating in the writing of rules
62 necessary to implement this article and reviewing reports
63 prior to dissemination by the SHPDA.
64 (5) SHPDA. The State Health Planning and Development
65 Agency.
66 (6) STATE STATEWIDE HEALTH COORDINATING COUNCIL. The
67 council which is defined in Section 22-21-260(15)."
68 "§22-21-260
69 As used in this article, the following words and terms,
70 and the plurals thereof, shall have the meanings ascribed to
71 them in this section, unless otherwise required by their
72 respective context:
73 (1) ACQUISITION. Obtaining the legal equitable title to
74 a freehold or leasehold estate or otherwise obtaining the
75 substantial benefit of such titles or estates, whether by
76 purchase, lease, loan or suffrage, gift, devise, legacy,
77 settlement of a trust, or means whatever, and shall include
78 any act of acquisition. The term "acquisition" shalldoes not
79 mean or include:
80 a. anyAny conveyance, or creation of any lien or
81 security interest by mortgage, deed of trust, security
82 agreement, or similar financing instrument, nor shall it mean
83 or include any;
84 b. Any transfer of title or rights as a result of the
Page 3

b. Any transfer of title or rights as a result of the
SB82 INTRODUCED
85 foreclosure, or conveyance or transfer in lieu of the
86 foreclosure, of any such mortgage, deed of trust, security
87 agreement, or similar financing instrument, nor shall it mean
88 or include any; or
89 c. Any gift, devise, legacy, settlement of trust, or
90 other transfer of the legal or equitable title of an interest
91 specified hereinabove by a natural personan individual to any
92 member of such person'sthe individual's immediate family. For
93 the purposes of this sectionparagraph, "immediate family"
94 shall meanmeans the spouse of the grantor or transferor and
95 any other person related to the grantor or transferor to the
96 fourth degree of kindred as such degrees are computed
97 according to law.
98 (2) APPLICANT. Any person, as defined in this section,
99 who files an application for a certificate of need.
100 (2.1)(3) CAMPUS. The contiguous real property,
101 contained within a single county, which is owned or leased by
102 a health care facility and upon which is located the buildings
103 and any other real property used by the health care facility
104 to provide existing institutional health services which are
105 subject to review.
106 (3)(4) CAPITAL EXPENDITURE. An expenditure, including a
107 force account expenditure (i.e., an expenditure for a
108 construction project undertaken by the health care facility as
109 its own contractor), which, under generally accepted
110 accounting principles, is not properly chargeable as an
111 expense of operation and maintenance and which satisfies any
112 of the following:
Page 4

of the following:
SB82 INTRODUCED
113 a. Exceeds two million dollars ($2,000,000) indexed
114 annually for inflation for major medical equipment; eight
115 hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) for new annual operating
116 costs indexed annually for inflation; four million dollars
117 ($4,000,000) indexed annually for inflation for any other
118 capital expenditure. The index referenced in this paragraph
119 shall be the Consumer Price Index Market Basket Professional
120 Medical Services index as published by the U.S. Department of
121 Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. The SHPDA shall publish
122 this index information to the general public.
123 b. Changes the bed capacity of the facility with
124 respect to which such expenditure is made.
125 c. Substantially changes the health services of the
126 facility with respect to which such expenditure is made.
127 (4)(5) CONSTRUCTION. Actual commencement, with bona
128 fide intention of completing the construction, or completion
129 of the construction, erection, remodeling, relocation,
130 excavation, or fabrication of any real property constituting a
131 facility under this article, and the term construct shall mean
132 and includemeans and includes any act of construction. "Ground
133 breaking ceremony," "receipt of bids," "receipt of quotation,"
134 or similar action that will permit unilateral termination
135 without penalty shall not be considered construction.
136 (5)(6) FIRM COMMITMENT or OBLIGATION. Any of the
137 following:
138 a. Any executed, enforceable, unconditional written
139 agreement or contract not subject to unilateral cancellation
140 for the acquisition or construction of a health care facility
Page 5

for the acquisition or construction of a health care facility
SB82 INTRODUCED
141 or purchase of equipment therefor.
142 b. Actual construction of facilities peculiarly adapted
143 to the furnishing of one or more particular services and with
144 the bona fide intention of furnishing such service or
145 services.
146 c. Any executed, unconditional written agreement not
147 subject to unilateral cancellation for the bona fide purpose
148 of furnishing one or more services.
149 (6)(7) HEALTH CARE FACILITY. General and specialized
150 hospitals, including tuberculosis, psychiatric, long-term
151 care, and other types of hospitals, and related facilities
152 such as, laboratories, out-patient clinics, and central
153 service facilities operated in connection with hospitals;
154 skilled nursing facilities; intermediate care facilities;
155 skilled or intermediate care units operated in veterans'
156 nursing homes and veterans' homes, owned or operated by the
157 State Department of Veterans'Veterans Affairs, as these terms
158 are described in Chapter 5A, (commencing with Section
159 31-5A-1), of Title 31, rehabilitation centers; public health
160 centers; facilities for surgical treatment of patients not
161 requiring hospitalization; kidney disease treatment centers,
162 including free-standing hemodialysis units; community mental
163 health centers and related facilities; alcohol and drug abuse
164 facilities; facilities for the developmentally disabled;
165 hospice service providers; and home health agencies and health
166 maintenance organizations. The term health care facility
167 shalldoes not include the offices of private physicians or
168 dentists, whether for individual or group practices and
Page 6

dentists, whether for individual or group practices and
SB82 INTRODUCED
169 regardless of ownership, or Christian Science sanatoriums
170 operated or listed and certified by the First Church of
171 Christ, Scientist, Boston, Massachusetts, or a veterans'
172 nursing home or veterans' home owned or operated by the State
173 Department of Veterans'Veterans Affairs, not to exceed 150
174 beds to be built in Bay Minette, Alabama, and a veterans'
175 nursing home or veterans' home owned or operated by the State
176 Department of Veterans'Veterans Affairs not to exceed 150 beds
177 to be built in Huntsville, Alabama, for which applications for
178 federal funds under federal law are being considered by the
179 U.S. Department of Veterans'Veterans Affairs prior to March
180 18, 1993.
181 (7)(8) HEALTH SERVICE AREA. A geographical area
182 designated by the Governor, as being appropriate for effective
183 planning and development of health services.
184 (8)(9) HEALTH SERVICES. Clinically related (i.e.,
185 diagnostic, curative, or rehabilitative) services, including
186 alcohol, drug abuse, and mental health services customarily
187 furnished on either an in-patient or out-patient basis by
188 health care facilities, but not including the lawful practice
189 of any profession or vocation conducted independently of a
190 health care facility and in accordance with applicable
191 licensing laws of this state.
192 (9)(10) INSTITUTIONAL HEALTH SERVICES. Health services
193 provided in or through health care facilities or health
194 maintenance organizations, including the entities in or
195 through which such services are provided.
196 (9.1)(11) MAJOR MEDICAL EQUIPMENT. Medical clinical
Page 7

(9.1)(11) MAJOR MEDICAL EQUIPMENT. Medical clinical
SB82 INTRODUCED
197 equipment intended for use in the diagnosis or treatment of
198 medical conditions, which is used to provide institutional
199 health services of a health care facility which are subject to
200 review, and which expenditure exceeds the thresholds
201 referenced in this section and in Section 22-21-263.
202 (10)(12) MODERNIZATION. The alteration, repair,
203 remodeling, and renovation of existing buildings, including
204 equipment within the existing buildings. Modernization does
205 not include the replacement of existing buildings which are
206 used by a health care facility to provide institutional health
207 services which are subject to review and does not include the
208 replacement of major medical equipment.
209 (11)(14) PERSON. Any personindividual, firm,
210 partnership, association, joint venture, corporation, limited
211 liability company, or other legal entity, the State of Alabama
212 and its political subdivisions or parts thereof, and any
213 agencies or instrumentalities and any combination of persons
214 herein specified, but person shallthe term does not include
215 the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof,
216 except in the case of voluntary submission to the regulations
217 established by this article.
218 (12) RURAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER/APPLICANT/HOSPITAL. A
219 provider or applicant or hospital which is designated by the
220 United States government Health Care Financing Administration
221 as rural(15) RURAL AREA. Any area in the State of Alabama
222 which is located outside of a metropolitan statistical area
223 that is listed in the Office of Management and Budget Bulletin
224 No.20-01 dated March 6, 2020.
Page 8

No.20-01 dated March 6, 2020.
SB82 INTRODUCED
225 (13)(16) STATE HEALTH PLAN. a. A comprehensive plan
226 which is prepared triennially and reviewed at least annually
227 and revised as necessary by the Statewide Health Coordinating
228 Council, with the assistance of the State Health Planning and
229 Development Agency, and approved by the Governor.
230 b. The Statewide Health Coordinating Council shall meet
231 at least annually to determine whether revisions for the State
232 Health Plan are necessary. If the Statewide Health
233 Coordinating Council fails to meet and to review or revise the
234 State Health Plan on an annual basis, there shall be no fees
235 required on all certificate of need applications filed with
236 the Certificate of Need Review Board until the Statewide
237 Health Coordinating Council meets and reviews or revises the
238 State Health Plan. For purposes of this paragraph, the annual
239 meeting of the Statewide Health Coordinating Council shall
240 occur on or before August 1 of each calendar year.
241 c. The State Health Plan shall provide for the
242 development of health programs and resources to assure that
243 quality health services will be available and accessible in a
244 manner which assures continuity of care, at reasonable costs,
245 for all residents of the state. Nothing in this section should
246 be construed as permitting expenditures for facilities,
247 services, or equipment which are inconsistent with the State
248 Health Plan.
249 (14)(17) STATE HEALTH PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT AGENCY
250 (SHPDA)or STATE AGENCY or SHPDA. An agency of the State of
251 Alabama which is designated by the Governor as the sole State
252 Health Planning and Development Agency, which shall consist of
Page 9

Health Planning and Development Agency, which shall consist of
SB82 INTRODUCED
253 three consumers, three providers, and three representatives of
254 the Governor who all shall serve staggered terms and all be
255 appointed by the Governor. Where used in this article, the
256 terms, "state agency," and the "SHPDA," shall be synonymous
257 and may be used interchangeably.
258 (15)(18) STATEWIDE HEALTH COORDINATING COUNCIL. A
259 council, appointed by the Governor,- established pursuant to
260 Sections 22-4-7 and 22-4-8 to advise the State Health Planning
261 and Development Agency on matters relating to health planning
262 and resource development and to perform other functions as may
263 be delegated to it, to include an annual review of the State
264 Health Plan.
265 (16)(13) TO OFFER. When used in connection with health
266 services, a health care facility or health maintenance
267 organization that holds itself out as capable of providing, or
268 as having the means for the provision of, specified health
269 services."
270 "§22-21-263
271 (a) All new institutional health services whichthat are
272 subject to this article and whichthat are proposed to be
273 offered or developed within the state shall be subject to
274 review under this article. No institutional health services
275 whichthat are subject to this article shall be permitted which
276 are inconsistent with the State Health Plan. For the purposes
277 of this article, new institutional health services shall
278 include any of the following:
279 (1) The construction, development, acquisition through
280 lease or purchase, or other establishment of a new health care
Page 10

lease or purchase, or other establishment of a new health care
SB82 INTRODUCED
281 facility or health maintenance organization. A transaction
282 involving the sale, lease, or other transfer or change of
283 control of an existing health care facility, existing health
284 maintenance organization, or existing institutional health
285 service is not subject to certificate of need review or
286 approval under this article unless the transaction also
287 involves implementing one or more of the new institutional
288 health services described in subdivision (2), (3), or (4). The
289 two immediately preceding sentences are applicable to all
290 transactions occurring on or after July 30, 1979.
291 Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this article,
292 expenditures incurred in the sale, lease, or other transfer of
293 an existing health care facility or existing health
294 maintenance organization or existing institutional health
295 service shall not be subject to subdivision (2).
296 (2) Any expenditure by or on behalf of a health care
297 facility or health maintenance organization which, under
298 generally accepted accounting principles consistently applied,
299 is a capital expenditure in excess of two million dollars
300 ($2,000,000) indexed annually for inflation for major medical
301 equipment; in excess of eight hundred thousand dollars
302 ($800,000) for new annual operating costs indexed annually for
303 inflation; and in excess of four million dollars ($4,000,000)
304 indexed annually for inflation for any other capital
305 expenditure by or on behalf of a health care facility or a
306 health maintenance organization. The index referenced in this
307 subdivision shall be the Consumer Price Index Market Basket
308 Professional Medical Services index as published by the U.S.
Page 11

Professional Medical Services index as published by the U.S.
SB82 INTRODUCED
309 Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. The SHPDA
310 shall publish this index information to the general public.
311 (3) A change in the existing bed capacity of a health
312 care facility or health maintenance organization through the
313 addition of new beds, the relocation of one or more beds from
314 one physical facility to another, or reallocation among
315 services of existing beds through the conversion of one or
316 more beds from one category to another within the following
317 bed categories: general medical surgical, inpatient
318 psychiatric, inpatient/residential alcohol and drug abuse or
319 inpatient rehabilitation beds, or long-term care beds
320 including skilled nursing care, intermediate care,
321 transitional care, and swing beds. Notwithstanding any
322 provision of this subdivision to the contrary, any health care
323 facility or health maintenance organization in which at least
324 65 percent of the beds are dedicated or used exclusively for
325 acute care services, general medical surgical, or
326 nonspecialized services may reallocate existing beds within
327 the following specialized bed categories: inpatient
328 psychiatric, inpatient/residential alcohol and drug
329 rehabilitation beds, to acute care services, or general
330 medical surgical beds without first obtaining a certificate of
331 need from the SHPDA.
332 (4) Health services proposed to be offered in or
333 through a health care facility or health maintenance
334 organization, and which were not offered on a regular basis in
335 or through suchthe health care facility or health maintenance
336 organization within the 12 month12-month period prior to the
Page 12

organization within the 12 month12-month period prior to the
SB82 INTRODUCED
337 time suchthe services would be offered. Health services, other
338 than those health services involving long-term care services,
339 including, without limitation, skilled and intermediate
340 nursing home care, swing beds services, or transitional care
341 services, provided directly by acute care hospitals classified
342 as rural by the U.S. Bureau of Census/Office of Management and
343 Budget, United States government Health Care Financing
344 Administration or acute care hospitals with less than 105 beds
345 that are located over 20 miles from the nearest acute health
346 care facility located within Alabama shall not be subject to
347 this subdivision but shall be subject to the other
348 subdivisions of this subsection. Provided, however, that
349 theThe exemption from this subdivision herein established
350 shall not apply to home health services provided outside of
351 the county in which the hospital is located.
352 (b) The four conditions of new institutional health
353 services listed in this section shall be mutually exclusive.
354 (c) Any new institutional health service, as described
355 in subsection (a), proposed to be offered or developed in a
356 rural area on or after October 1, 2026, shall not be subject
357 to review under this article.
358 (c)(d) Notwithstanding all other provisions of this
359 article to the contrary, those facilities and distinct units
360 operated by the Department of Mental Health and those
361 facilities and distinct units operating under contract or
362 subcontract with the Department of Mental Health where the
363 contract constitutes the primary source of income to the
364 facility shall not be subject to review under this article.
Page 13

facility shall not be subject to review under this article.
SB82 INTRODUCED
365 (d)(e) For the purposes of this article, and
366 notwithstanding all other provisions of this article to the
367 contrary and notwithstanding any and all provisions of the
368 State Health Plan on September 1, 2003, relating to
369 lithotripsy, magnetic resonance imaging, and positron emission
370 tomography, new institutional health services, whichthat are
371 subject to this article, shall not include any health services
372 provided by a mobile or fixed-based extracorporeal shock wave
373 lithotripter, mobile or fixed-based magnetic resonance
374 imaging, or positron emission tomography proposed to be
375 offered in or through a health care facility or health
376 maintenance organization. The SHPDA, after consultation with
377 and the advice of the Statewide Health Coordinating Council,
378 in accordance with the Alabama Administrative Procedure Act
379 and within 60 days of September 1, 2003, shall cause the State
380 Health Plan to be amended to repeal and delete all sections of
381 the Alabama State Health Plan relating to mobile and
382 fixed-based lithotripters, mobile and fixed-based magnetic
383 resonance imaging, and positron emission tomography, and cause
384 the amendment and repeal of any other SHPDA rules and
385 regulations inconsistent with this article."
386 "§22-21-265
387 (a) On or after July 30, 1979, noNo person to which
388 this article applies shall acquire, construct, or operate a
389 new institutional health service, as defined in this article,
390 or furnish or offer, or purport to furnish a new institutional
391 health service, as defined in this article, or make an
392 arrangement or commitment for financing the offering of a new
Page 14

arrangement or commitment for financing the offering of a new
SB82 INTRODUCED
393 institutional health service, unless the person shall first
394 obtain from the SHPDA a certificate of need therefor., except
395 for the following, which shall not be required to obtain a
396 certificate of need:
397 (1) Any person who proposes to acquire, construct,
398 operate, furnish, or offer a new institutional health service,
399 to be located in a rural area, or who arranges for or commits
400 to the financing of the same.
401 (2) Notwithstanding any provisionsprovision of this
402 article to the contrary, those facilities and distinct units
403 operated by the Department of Mental Health, and those
404 facilities and distinct units operating under contract or
405 subcontract with the Department of Mental Health where the
406 contract constitutes the primary source of income to the
407 facility, shall not be required to obtain a certificate of
408 need under this article.
409 (b)(1) Notwithstanding all other provisionsany other
410 provision of this article to the contrary, the replacement of
411 equipment by health care facilities shall be exempt from
412 certificate of need review, provided:
413 (1)a. The replacement does not change the purpose, use,
414 or application of the equipment.-;
415 (2)b. The existing equipment is taken out of service.-;
416 (3)c. The replacement equipment does not enable the
417 health care facility to expand its health services.; and
418 (4)d. The replacement equipment does not enable the
419 health care facility to provide any health services not
420 previously provided on a regular basis.
Page 15

previously provided on a regular basis.
SB82 INTRODUCED
421 (2) A determination of whether the acquisition of
422 equipment is exempt from review under this section shall be
423 made by the Executive Director of the SHPDA upon the filing of
424 an application requesting the determination, on the form or
425 forms prescribed by the CON Review Board, together with a fee
426 in the amount of 20 percent of the fee provided in Section
427 22-21-271. If it is determined that the replacement is not
428 reviewable pursuant to this section, the applicant shall be
429 notified in writing that no certificate of need is required.
430 The SHPDA shall define an appeals process.
431 Any provision in this article to the contrary
432 notwithstanding, a rural hospital shall only be required to
433 submit a fee equal to 25 percent of the fee applicable to
434 non-rural hospitals when filing a request for determination
435 under this section.
436 (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article
437 to the contrary, the modernization or construction of a
438 nonclinical building, parking facility, or any other
439 noninstitutional health services capital item on the existing
440 campus of a health care facility shall be exempt from
441 certificate of need review, provided the construction or
442 modernization does not allow the health care facility to
443 provide new institutional health services subject to review
444 and not previously provided on a regular basis.
445 (d) The SHPDA shall maintain the Alabama State Health
446 Plan to include separate bed need methodologies for inpatient
447 psychiatric services, inpatient rehabilitation services, and
448 inpatient/residential alcohol and drug abuse services. The
Page 16

inpatient/residential alcohol and drug abuse services. The
SB82 INTRODUCED
449 SHPDA shall utilize these methodologies in considering all
450 certificate of need applications.
451 (e) Notwithstanding all other provisionsany other
452 provision of this article to the contrary, the increase in the
453 number of nursing home beds of a health care facility licensed
454 pursuant to Section 22-21-260(6) as a skilled nursing care
455 facility or an intermediate care facility, but excluding an
456 increase in the bed capacity of an intermediate care facility
457 designated as an ICF-MR by the State Board ofCommittee on
458 Public Health and operated by the state Department of Mental
459 Health which facilities shall beare governed by the other
460 provisions of this article, shall beare exempt from
461 certificate of need review, provided:
462 (1) The increase does not exceed 10 percent of the
463 total skilled nursing beds of the facility, rounded to the
464 nearest whole number, or 10 beds, whichever is greater.
465 (2) The average rate of occupancy for the nursing home
466 beds of the facility is not less than 95 percent, rounded to
467 the nearest whole number, for the 24-month period ending on
468 June 30 of the year immediately preceding the application for
469 exemption from the certificate of need review.
470 (3) The aggregate average rate of occupancy for all
471 other skilled nursing facilities and intermediate nursing
472 facilities in the same county as the requesting facility's is
473 not less than 95 percent, rounded to the nearest whole number,
474 for the 24-month period ending on June 30 of the year
475 immediately preceding the application for exemption from
476 certificate of need review.
Page 17

certificate of need review.
SB82 INTRODUCED
477 (4) The increase does not require capital expenditures
478 exceeding the capital expenditure thresholds prescribed in
479 Section 22-21-263(a)(2).
480 (5) The facility has not been granted an increase of
481 beds under this exemption within the immediately preceding
482 24-month period.
483 In calculating the average occupancy for the facility
484 under subdivision (2) of this subsection and for all other
485 skilled and intermediate nursing facilities in the same county
486 under subdivision (3) of this subsection, beds previously
487 granted, including beds granted after January 1, 1995, to the
488 facility, and to other skilled or intermediate nursing
489 facilities in the same county as the requesting facility,
490 pursuant to a certificate of need or to this exemption shall
491 be deemed built and available for occupancy as of the date
492 granted regardless of when the beds were placed in service.
493 The SHPDA shall promulgate regulationsadopt rules to determine
494 how occupancy shall be calculated for the purpose of this
495 subsection, taking into account certain factors such as, but
496 without limitation, disregarding beds that have not been
497 available for use for the three years next preceding the
498 period for which occupancy is being measured.
499 (6) The facility has had an average daily census
500 comprised of 40 percent of Medicaid patients within the fiscal
501 year ended June 30 immediately prior to filing an application
502 for exemption under this section.
503 (7)a. Any exemption to add beds without a certificate
504 of need shall expire and be deemed null and void unless the
Page 18

of need shall expire and be deemed null and void unless the
SB82 INTRODUCED
505 beds are placed in service not less than 12 months after the
506 date the exemption is granted. Notwithstanding the foregoing,
507 the SHPDA may promulgateadopt rules permitting the Executive
508 Director of SHPDA to grant one extension not to exceed
509 twelve12 months upon a showing of substantial progress.
510 Notwithstanding the foregoing, any exemption granted by the
511 SHPDA prior to April 10, 1995, for facilities which have
512 agreed to the provisions of the June 21, 1995, consent decree,
513 is ratified and confirmed and shall be deemed to have been
514 granted in accordance with this subsection. In addition, any
515 facility which was granted an exemption by the SHPDA prior to
516 April 10, 1995, is ratified and confirmed and shall be deemed
517 to have been approved as of the latter of the actual date
518 approved or March 3, 1995, and to have been granted in
519 accordance with this subsection.
520 b. A determination of whether the increase in beds is
521 exempt from review under this section shall be made by the
522 Executive Director of the SHPDA upon the filing of an
523 application requesting the determination, on the form or forms
524 prescribed by the CON Review Board, together with a fee in an
525 amount to be determined by the review board in accordance with
526 Section 22-21-271(a). The SHPDA shall promulgateadopt rules
527 affording an applicant pursuant to this subsection a right to
528 appeal adverse rulings.
529 c. Applications pursuant to this section for exemption
530 from certificate of need review for an increase in bed
531 capacity shall be made only during the 90-day period beginning
532 January 1 through March 31 of each year.
Page 19

January 1 through March 31 of each year.
SB82 INTRODUCED
533 d. The provisions of this section shall automatically
534 terminate and become null and void on December 31, 2005,
535 unless a bill to continue or reestablish the provisions of
536 this section shall be passed by both houses of the Legislature
537 and enacted into law.
538 (f)(1) Notwithstanding all other provisionsany other
539 provision of this article to the contrary, an existing home
540 health agency may accept referrals of patients from outside
541 its Medicare certified service area without obtaining a
542 certificate of need, provided all of the following conditions
543 are met:
544 (1)a. The county of the referral is contiguous to a
545 county for which the home health agency holds a certificate of
546 need or an exemption granted pursuant to provisions of Section
547 22-21-263.
548 (2)b. The home health agency establishes no branch
549 office in the county of the referral.
550 (3)c. The home health agency incurs no capital
551 expenditures in the county of the referral in excess of five
552 hundred dollars ($500).
553 (2) The home health agency shall notify the SHPDA that
554 it has begun accepting referrals from a county contiguous to
555 its service area within 14 days of the receipt of the first
556 referral from the contiguous county. No notice to the SHPDA
557 shall be required related to subsequent referrals in the same
558 contiguous county. The SHPDA shall take steps to provide for
559 the inclusion of statistical information relating to the
560 service to referrals outside the Medicare certified service
Page 20

service to referrals outside the Medicare certified service
SB82 INTRODUCED
561 area in its annual statistical reports. The SHPDA may impose,
562 by rule, a reasonable charge upon home health agencies
563 accepting such referrals to cover the additional cost of
564 gathering and processing the information.
565 (g) Notwithstanding all other provisionsany other
566 provision of this article to the contrary, the replacement,
567 including relocation in the same county, of an existing acute
568 care hospital by the construction of a new digital hospital
569 shall be exempt from certificate of need review provided the
570 hospital meets all of the following:
571 (1) The digital hospital design incorporates a fully
572 automated, centralized, digital system to integrate all
573 current and future medical technologies with capabilities for
574 all systems to interface in a comprehensive medical record.
575 The integration of medical technology shall include, but not
576 be limited to, all patient medical records, diagnostic images,
577 diagnostic reports, laboratory results, pharmacy data,
578 pharmacological interactions, contraindications, surgical
579 reports, surgical streaming video, pathology reports, unique
580 patient identification, voice activated transcription,
581 wireless applications, automated billing with electronic
582 transmission capability, and electronic procurement systems.
583 (2) The electronic medical systems shall interface on a
584 single electronic platform to produce the most favorable
585 patient outcome with a reduction in medical errors.
586 (3) Medical records shall only be accessed by
587 authorized clinical personnel who are provided access by
588 hospital consoles, physician offices, physician homes, or any
Page 21

hospital consoles, physician offices, physician homes, or any
SB82 INTRODUCED
589 remote location via unique identification requirements.
590 (4) Patient rooms shall be designed to provide optimal
591 electronic documentation of vital signs, real-time data entry,
592 any and all treatment protocols, physician orders, and patient
593 progression.
594 (5) The digital hospital shall have a minimum project
595 cost of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) to include
596 design, systems, property, buildings, equipment, and
597 electronic software development.
598 (6) The construction and design of the facility shall
599 utilize technology and materials for patient flow to limit
600 general public contact with patient care areas,
601 healthcarehealth care workers, and hazardous materials to
602 reduce the potential for cross-contamination and resulting
603 direct medical costs.
604 (7) The digital hospital environment shall be energy
605 efficient, cost effective, and clinically designed to produce
606 the most favorable environment.
607 (8) The digital hospital shall meet all of the
608 following conditions:
609 a. Operate as an acute care hospital.
610 b. Replace an existing acute care hospital located in
611 the same county as the digital hospital.
612 c. Be licensed for no more than the same number of
613 hospital beds and for the same bed categories as the existing
614 acute care hospital to be replaced by the digital hospital,
615 unless otherwise approved by the Certificate of Need Review
616 Board through issuance of a certificate of need.
Page 22

Board through issuance of a certificate of need.
SB82 INTRODUCED
617 d. Shall not exceed the same scope of health services,
618 including the same amount of diagnostic or therapeutic major
619 medical equipment, as the existing acute care hospital to be
620 replaced by the digital hospital, unless otherwise approved by
621 the SHPDA approval process.
622 e. Shall not exceed the number of inpatient and
623 outpatient surgical suites as contained in the existing acute
624 care hospital to be replaced by the digital hospital, unless
625 otherwise approved by the SHPDA approval process.
626 (9) The existing acute care hospital, replaced by the
627 digital hospital, shall be taken out of service as an acute
628 care hospital and shall not be converted to or used as another
629 health care facility, unless approved by the Certificate of
630 Need Review Board through issuance of a certificate of need.
631 (10) Any presently reviewable health service which is
632 proposed to be offered by the digital hospital which was not
633 offered on a regular basis within the preceding
634 twelve-month12-month period in or through the existing acute
635 care hospital to be replaced by the digital hospital shall be
636 subject to Certificate of Need Review Board approval through
637 issuance of a certificate of need.
638 (11) The only digital hospital exempt from certificate
639 of need review shall be the first digital hospital developed
640 in the state, and the digital hospital shall be located in a
641 county where there is located an accredited medical school and
642 teaching facility and not less than 3,000 licensed general
643 hospital beds, and construction shall be commenced within one
644 year from the issuance of a certificate of need by the SHPDA.
Page 23

year from the issuance of a certificate of need by the SHPDA.
SB82 INTRODUCED
645 (12) A determination whether the construction of a
646 digital hospital is exempt from review under this subsection
647 shall be made by the Executive Director of the SHPDA, upon the
648 filing of an application requesting the determination, on the
649 forms acceptable to the Executive Director of the SHPDA
650 together with an application fee as provided in Section
651 22-21-271. If it is determined that the replacement facility
652 is not reviewable pursuant to this section, the SHPDA shall
653 notify the applicant in writing that the application is exempt
654 from certificate of need review and shall issue a certificate
655 of need. The applicant shall have a right of appeal from any
656 adverse ruling denying exemption and the SHPDA shall
657 promulgateadopt rules affording an applicant a right to appeal
658 adverse rulings pursuant to this subsection.
659 (13) The provisions of this subsection shall
660 automatically terminate and become null and void upon the
661 issuance of the first certificate of need for the construction
662 and operation of a digital replacement hospital as herein
663 provided or on December 31, 2005, whichever first occurs,
664 unless a bill to continue or reestablish the provisions of
665 this subsection shall be passed by both houses of the
666 Legislature and enacted into law."
667 "§22-21-271
668 (a) Each application for a certificate of need shall be
669 accompanied by a fee of one percent of the estimated cost of
670 the proposed cost of the new Institutional Health Service, or
671 a maximum of twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) (indexed) per
672 application. Provided, that the application fee shall be
Page 24

application. Provided, that the application fee shall be
SB82 INTRODUCED
673 three-fourths of one percent of the estimated cost of the
674 proposed new Institutional Health Service, or a maximum of
675 eight thousand dollars ($8,000) if the applicant has had an
676 average daily census comprised of 50 percent or more Medicaid
677 patients within the last year prior to the filing of the
678 application and a maximum of six thousand dollars ($6,000) if
679 a rural hospital applicant has had an average daily census
680 comprised of 30 percent or more Medicaid/Medicare patients
681 within the last year prior to the filing of the application.
682 The minimum fee shall be set by the SHPDA. Fees shall be used
683 for the purpose of defraying the lawful operating expense of
684 the certificate of need program conducted by the SHPDA and of
685 the Statewide Health Coordinating Council.
686 (b) Each request for an opinion from the State
687 Agencystate agency as to whether a project is subject to
688 review under this article shall be accompanied by a fee to be
689 established by the SHPDA.
690 (c) The SHPDA, by rule approved by the Certificate of
691 Need Review Board or the Statewide Health Coordinating
692 Council, as applicable, may impose additional reasonable fees
693 for any administrative filing by a health care provider for
694 which a fee is not specified in this chapter, and for any
695 non-routine data compilation or summary. Nothing in this
696 subsection shall authorize the SHPDA to impose a fee for the
697 initial publication of any report or statistical update which
698 it is required to publish under law or rule.
699 (d) In addition to all other fees, the SHPDA shall
700 impose a temporary surcharge of two thousand dollars ($2,000)
Page 25

impose a temporary surcharge of two thousand dollars ($2,000)
SB82 INTRODUCED
701 on each certificate of need application and three hundred
702 dollars ($300) for each reviewability determination to defray
703 expenses incurred in developing and implementing, by January
704 1, 2014, an online, searchable filing system for filings and
705 orders in administrative proceedings and requests for
706 reviewability or exemption determinations and related agency
707 findings. The surcharge shall automatically terminate on the
708 first day of the ninth month after certification to the CON
709 Review Board by the SHPDA's Executive Director that the online
710 filing system has been successfully implemented.
711 (e) There is hereby authorized to be appropriated from
712 the State General Fund of the State of Alabama such amounts as
713 may be necessary from time to time to defray the costs of
714 administering this article over and above such fees as may be
715 collected under this section.
716 (f) Application fees collected under this article shall
717 not be refundable. Fees collected under this article are
718 hereby appropriated for the purposes stated in this article.
719 (g) All fees collected under this article shall be
720 retained in a separate fund for the purpose of enforcing and
721 administering this article, and shall be disbursed as other
722 funds of the state are disbursed."
723 Section 2. Section 22-21-278, Code of Alabama 1975,
724 relating to an exemption from the review requirement for
725 certain kidney disease treatment centers, is repealed.
726 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
727 1, 2026.
Page 26